Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.40.830

The Evergreen State College—Trustees, powers and duties—Existing statutes as applicable to college—Federal benefits and donations.

The board of trustees of The Evergreen State College shall have all the powers and duties as are presently or may hereafter be granted to existing state colleges by law. All statutes pertaining to the existing state colleges shall have full force and application to The Evergreen State College.

The Evergreen State College is hereby deemed entitled to receive and share in all the benefits and donations made and given to similar institutions by the enabling act or other federal law to the same extent as other state colleges are entitled to receive and share in such benefits and donations.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.830. Prior: 1967 c 47 s 5. Formerly RCW 28.81.630.]